Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 4.02. Chesapeake Bay Watershed Nutrient Credit Exchange Program.
§ 62.1-44.19:22.
Enforcement and penalties.

Transfer of certified nutrient credits by an operator of a nutrient credit-generating entity may be suspended by the Department until such time as the operator comes into compliance with this article and attendant regulations.

(For expiration date — see notes) Any operator of a nutrient credit-generating entity who violates any provision of this article, or of any regulations adopted hereunder, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 within the discretion of the court. The Department may issue a summons for collection of the civil penalty, and the action may be prosecuted in the appropriate circuit court. When the penalties are assessed by the court as a result of a summons issued by the Department, the court shall direct the penalty to be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Stormwater Management Fund established pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:29

.

B.

(For effective date — see notes)

Any operator of a nutrient credit-generating entity who violates any provision of this article, or of any regulations adopted hereunder, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 within the discretion of the court. The Department may issue a summons for collection of the civil penalty, and the action may be prosecuted in the appropriate circuit court. When the penalties are assessed by the court as a result of a summons issued by the Department, the court shall direct the penalty to be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Stormwater Local Assistance Fund established pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:29.1

.

History.

2012, cc. 748, 808, § 10.1-603.15:4; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Subsection B set out twice.

The second version of subsection B above is effective on July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For subsection B as in effect until that time, see the first version above.

Editor’s note.

For complete transition provisions related to transfer of certain water quality programs (stormwater management, erosion and sediment control, and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas) formerly administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, to the Department of Environmental Quality, see Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cls. 4 through 14, noted in full under Article 2.3 (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “Stormwater Local Assistance Fund established pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:29

.1” for “Virginia Stormwater Management Fund established pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:29

.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.19:23.
Appeals.

Any person applying to establish a nutrient credit-generating entity or an operator of a nutrient credit-generating entity aggrieved by any action of the Department taken in accordance with this section, or by inaction of the Department, shall have the right to review in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

2012, cc. 748, 808, § 10.1-603.15:5; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Editor’s note.

For complete transition provisions related to transfer of certain water quality programs (stormwater management, erosion and sediment control, and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas) formerly administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, to the Department of Environmental Quality, see Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cls. 4 through 14, noted in full under Article 2.3 (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.